Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
Penalties

615.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS 615.040(4) shall be imprisoned in the county jail not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days, or fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), or both.

Any person who upon thirty (30) days’ notice fails to remove a child from the state when required to do so under a bond as provided in KRS 615.040(5)(c) or (d) shall forfeit one thousand dollars ($1,000), to be recovered upon the bond by a suit in the name of the county in which the bond is filed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 61, effective July 1, 1987.